Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB624.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 11A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Ceremonial check" means any physical or digital representation of
taxpayer dollars being allocated, awarded, or spent that is used for publicity,
promotional, or ceremonial purposes; and
(b) "Executive branch official" means the Governor, Attorney General,
Treasurer, Auditor of Public Accounts, Secretary of State, Commissioner of
Agriculture, or any agency head, commissioner, or representative of an
executive branch agency.
(2) A executive branch official shall not present, display, or distribute a ceremonial
check without the express written consent of both the President of the Senate and
the Speaker of the House of Representatives. The written consent shall be issued
only upon review and approval of the specific allocation of funds, ensuring
transparency and legislative oversight.
(3) Any ceremonial check presented without proper authorization under subsection
(2) of this subsection shall be considered a violation of this section. Any executive
branch official found in violation is subject to the following penalties:
(a) A fine of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation;
(b) Public censure by the General Assembly; and
(c) Referral to the appropriate ethics commission for further investigation.
(4) The Kentucky Legislative Ethics Commission shall have the authority to enforce
compliance and investigate complaints related to unauthorized presentations of
ceremonial checks under this section.
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/13/2025 4:36 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1778
Section 2. The purpose of Section 1 of this Act is to ensure legislative oversight
and prevent unauthorized use of taxpayer funds for political or promotional purposes by
requiring approval from the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of
Representatives before any executive branch official presents a ceremonial check
representing state expenditures.
Section 3. Whereas it is critical to prevent unauthorized use of taxpayer funds,
an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage and approval
by the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/13/2025 4:36 PM Jacketed